Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB170.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1302(10) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subparagraphs to read:§ 1302. Vehicles exempt from registration.The following types of vehicles are exempt from registration:* * *(10) Any farm vehicle used exclusively upon a farm or farms owned or operated by the owner of the vehicle, subject to the following:* * *(i.5) Type AA--Such a farm vehicle with a gross 1234567891011121314151617181920 vehicle weight rating not exceeding 10,000 pounds and which displays a currently valid certificate of inspection may be driven without any restriction as to time but may only be driven on highways between:(A) Parts of one such farm.(B) Such farms located not more than 50 miles apart.(C) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of 50 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies.(D) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of 50 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of repairing or servicing of the farm vehicle or the trailer or semitrailer being towed or hauled by the farm vehicle.(i.6) Type BB--Such a farm vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of greater than 10,000 pounds and not exceeding 17,000 pounds and which displays a currently valid certificate of inspection may be driven without any restriction as to time but may only be driven on highways between:(A) Parts of one such farm.(B) Such farms located not more than 25 miles apart.(C) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of 25 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies.(D) Such farm or farms and a place of business 20250HB0170PN2721 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 located within a radius of 50 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of repairing or servicing of the farm vehicle or the trailer or semitrailer being towed or hauled by the farm vehicle.(i.7) Type CC--Such a farm vehicle which does qualify as a motor carrier vehicle and displays a currently valid certificate of inspection may be driven without any restriction as to time but may only be driven on highways between:(A) Parts of one such farm.(B) Such farms located not more than ten miles apart.(C) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of ten miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies.(D) Such farm or farms and a place of business located within a radius of 25 miles from such farm or farms for the purpose of buying or selling agricultural commodities or supplies.* * *Section 2. Sections 1924(b), 4702(a) and 4703(a) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 1924. Farm vehicles.* * *(b) Certificate of exemption.--The biennial processing fee for a certificate of exemption issued in lieu of registration of a farm vehicle shall be determined by the type of certificate issued and the gross weight or combination weight or weight rating according to the following table:20250HB0170PN2721 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Certificate type Weight in pounds FeeType A 10,000 or less $24Type B greater than 10,000 andnot exceeding 17,000 24Type C greater than 17,000 50Type D greater than 17,000 100Type AA 10,000 or less 24Type BB greater than 10,000 and not exceeding 17,000 24Type CC greater than 17,000 50§ 4702. Requirement for periodic inspection of vehicles.(a) Annual safety inspection.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the department shall establish a system of annual safety inspection of vehicles, including emergency vehicles, farm vehicles [with a gross weight or gross vehicle weight rating of greater than 17,000 pounds] for which a Type D, Type AA, Type BB or Type CC biennial certificate of exemption has been issued and private noncommercial vehicles used to transport students.* * *§ 4703. Operation of vehicle without official certificate of inspection.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this section, no motor vehicle required to bear current registration plates issued by this Commonwealth and no farm vehicle [with a gross weight or gross vehicle weight rating of greater than 17,000 pounds] for which a Type D, Type AA, Type BB or Type CC biennial certificate of exemption has been issued shall be driven and no trailer required to bear current registration plates issued by this Commonwealth shall be moved on a highway 20250HB0170PN2721 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and no mass transit vehicle shall be operated unless the vehicle displays a currently valid certificate of inspection issued under this chapter.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0170PN2721 - 5 - 12345